Utah statutes.
67-5a-5.   Quorum -- Meetings.

(1)  The attendance of five members at any regular or special meeting of the council constitutes a quorum.  Any member may designate in writing a representative to attend any meeting.  The representative's attendance shall be counted toward the quorum, and he may vote on any issue.

(2)  A majority vote of the attending members or their representatives constituting a quorum is sufficient to carry any motion unless the council has by prior vote designated a greater percentage than a majority to sustain an action.

(3) (a)  The council shall meet at least quarterly at a time and place it designates.

(b)  The chairman or a majority of the members of the council may call a special meeting at any time or place upon five days notice to all of the members.  A quorum of all members may waive notice requirements in writing.

